California, session 20252026, AB2610.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 123100 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:123100. (a) The Legislature finds and declares that every person having who has ultimate responsibility for decisions respecting his or her their own health care also possesses a concomitant right of access to complete information respecting his or her regarding their condition and care provided. Similarly, persons having a person who has responsibility for decisions respecting regarding the health care of others another person should, in general, have access to information on regarding the patient’s condition and care. It(b) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to establish procedures for providing access to health care records or summaries of those records by patients and by those persons having who have responsibility for decisions respecting regarding the health care of others.